Oklahoma, session 2025, SB786.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1220, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1220. A. Except as provided in subsection C of this
section, it 1. It shall be unlawful for any operator to knowingly
transport or for any passenger to possess in any moving vehicle upon
a public highway, street, or alley any intoxicating alcoholic
beverage or low-point beer, as defined by Sections 163.1 and 163.2
in Section 1-103 of Title 37 37A of the Oklahoma Statutes, except in
the original container which shall not have been opened and from
which the original cap or seal shall not have been removed, unless
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB786 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

the opened container be is in the rear trunk or rear compartment,
which shall include the spare tire compartment in a station wagon or
panel truck, or any outside compartment which is not accessible to
the driver or any other person in the vehicle while it is in motion.
2. It shall be unlawful to consume marijuana or inhale
secondhand marijuana smoke due to another person’s consumption of
medical marijuana while operating a motor vehicle on a public
highway, street, or alley. A person operating a motor vehicle on a
public highway, street, or alley shall not possess any open
container that contains marijuana in the passenger area of the motor
vehicle.
Any person violating the provisions of this section shall be deemed
guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction shall be punished as
provided in subsection A of Section 566 6-125 of Title 37 37A of the
Oklahoma Statutes.
B. Any person convicted of violating any provision of
subsection A of this section shall, in addition to any fine imposed,
pay a special assessment trauma-care fee of One Hundred Dollars
($100.00) Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00) to be deposited into
the Trauma Care Assistance Revolving Fund created in Section 1-2522
1-2530.9 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
C. The provisions of paragraph 1 of subsection A of this
section shall not apply to the passenger area of buses and
limousines; however, it shall be unlawful for the driver of the bus
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB786 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

or l imousine to consume or have in the driver’s immediate possession
any intoxicating beverage or low-point beer.
D. No city, town, or county may adopt any order, ordinance,
rule, or regulation concerning the consumption or serving of
intoxicating beverages or low-point beer in buses or limousines.
E. As used in this section:
1. “Bus” means a vehicle as defined in Section 1-105 of Title
47 of the Oklahoma Statutes chartered for transportation of persons
for hire. It shall not mean a school bus, as defined by Section 1-
160 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes, transporting children or a
vehicle operated pursuant to a franchise with a city or town
operating over a regularly scheduled route; and
2. “Limousine” means a chauffeur-driven motor vehicle, other
than a bus or taxicab, as defined by Section 1-174 of Title 47 of
the Oklahoma Statutes, designed and used for transportation of
persons for compensation.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON PUBLIC SAFETY
February 11, 2025 - DO PASS AS AMENDED BY CS






SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB786 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)